Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,241
Advertising, defined.

Advertising shall mean all representations disseminated in any manner, other than labeling, intended or likely to induce the purchase or use of food, including a menu.

Laws 1981, LB 487, § 15;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 81-216.11;

Laws 1991, LB 358, § 10.